Maryland, session 2026, HB0406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–1505.
(a) Unless otherwise authorized by this article, a person may not have an interest
in more than one license issued by the Board, regardless of whether the person acts on the
person’s own behalf or on behalf of another person.
(b) The prohibition against issuing multiple licenses for the same premises or to
an individual for the use of that individual, a partnership, a corporation, an unincorporated
association, or a limited liability company does not apply if:
– 1 –

Ch. 823 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) each premises is a bowling establishment that has at least 30 lanes with
automatic pinsetters; and
(2) the licenses were issued before June 1, 1982.
(c) The prohibition against issuing multiple licenses for the same person or
premises does not apply to a Class B–ECF/DS license, CLASS B (ON–SALE) BEER AND
WINE LICENSE, OR CLASS B (ON–SALE) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –